Florida, session 2026, HB1157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Litigation
34 Investment Safeguards and Transparency Act."
35 Section 2. Sections 69.011, 69.021, 69.031, 69.041,
36 69.051, 69.061, 69.071, and 69.081, Florida Statutes, are
37 designated as part I of chapter 69, Florida Statutes, and
38 entitled "General Provisions."
39 Section 3. Part II of chapter 69, Florida Statutes,
40 consisting of ss. 69.101, 69.103, 69.105, 69.107, and 69.111,
41 Florida Statutes, is created and entitled "Litigation
42 Financing."
43 Section 4. Section 69.101, Florida Statutes, is created to
44 read:
45 69.101 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
46 (1) "Foreign funder" means a foreign person, foreign
47 principal, or sovereign wealth fund that provides funding
48 directly or indirectly under a litigation financing agreement.
49 (2) "Foreign person" means a person or an entity that is
50 not:
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
51 (a) A citizen of the United States;
52 (b) An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in
53 the United States;
54 (c) An unincorporated association, a majority of members
55 of which are citizens of the United States or aliens lawfully
56 admitted for permanent residence in the United States; or
57 (d) A corporation incorporated in the United States.
58 (3) "Foreign principal" means:
59 (a) The government or a government official of any country
60 other than the United States;
61 (b) A political subdivision or political party, or an
62 official thereof, of a country other than the United States; or
63 (c) A partnership, an association, a corporation, an
64 organization, or other combination of persons organized under
65 the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a
66 country other than the United States whose shares or other
67 ownership interest is owned by the government or a government
68 official of a country other than the United States or owned by a
69 political subdivision or political party, or an official
70 thereof, of a country other than the United States.
71 (4) "Health care practitioner" has the same meaning as in
72 s. 456.001.
73 (5) "Litigation financier" means a person engaged in the
74 business of providing litigation financing.
75 (6) "Litigation financing agreement" means a transaction
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
76 in which a litigation financier agrees to provide financing to a
77 person who is a party to or an attorney or a law firm
78 representing a party in a civil action, an administrative
79 proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding in exchange for a
80 right to receive payment, which right is contingent in any
81 respect on the outcome of such action, claim, or proceeding or
82 on the outcome of any matter within a portfolio that includes
83 such action, claim, or proceeding and involves the same counsel
84 or affiliated counsel. However, the term does not apply to any
85 of the following:
86 (a) An agreement wherein funds are provided for or to a
87 party to a civil action, an administrative proceeding, a claim,
88 or other legal proceeding for such person's use in paying his or
89 her costs of living or other personal or familial expenses
90 during the pendency of such action, claim, or proceeding and
91 where such funds are not used to finance any litigation or other
92 legal costs.
93 (b) An agreement wherein an attorney consents to provide
94 legal services on a contingency fee basis or to advance his or
95 her client's legal costs, and where such services or costs are
96 provided by the attorney in accordance with the Florida Rules of
97 Professional Conduct.
98 (c) An entity with a preexisting contractual obligation to
99 indemnify or defend a party to a civil action, an administrative
100 proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding.
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
101 (d) A health insurer that has paid, or is obligated to
102 pay, any sums for health care for an injured person under the
103 terms of a health insurance plan or agreement.
104 (e) The repayment of a financial institution, as defined
105 in s. 655.005(1), for loans made directly to a party to a civil
106 action, an administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal
107 proceeding or such party's attorney when repayment of the loan
108 is not contingent upon the outcome of such action, claim, or
109 proceeding or upon the outcome of any matter within a portfolio
110 that includes such action, claim, or proceeding and involves the
111 same counsel or affiliated counsel.
112 (f) Funding provided to a nonprofit organization, exempt
113 from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the United States
114 Internal Revenue Code, provided that the nonprofit organization
115 uses the funding only to provide pro bono legal representation
116 on behalf of a client or engage in litigation on behalf of
117 itself, its members, or a client and does not seek punitive
118 damages, regardless of whether the nonprofit organization seeks
119 an award of costs or attorney fees.
120 (g) Funding provided by a nonprofit organization exempt
121 from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the United States
122 Internal Revenue Code, by grant or otherwise, to cover the costs
123 and expenses of pro bono legal representation or litigation that
124 does not seek punitive damages, regardless of whether the
125 recipient of the funding seeks an award of costs or attorney
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
126 fees. The nonprofit organization may, contingent upon the
127 outcome of the litigation, receive repayment not to exceed the
128 amount of funding provided.
129 (7) "Proprietary information" means information developed,
130 created, or discovered by a person, or which became known by or
131 was conveyed to a person, which has commercial value in the
132 person's business. The term includes, but is not limited to,
133 domain names, trade secrets, copyrights, ideas, techniques,
134 inventions, regardless of whether patentable, and other
135 information of any type relating to designs, configurations,
136 documentation, recorded data, schematics, circuits, mask works,
137 layouts, source code, object code, master works, master
138 databases, algorithms, flow charts, formulae, works of
139 authorship, mechanisms, research, manufacture, improvements,
140 assembly, installation, intellectual property, including patents
141 and patent applications, and information concerning the person's
142 actual or anticipated business, research, or development or
143 received in confidence by or for the person from any other
144 source.
145 (8) "Sovereign wealth fund" means an investment fund owned
146 or controlled by a foreign principal or an agent thereof.
147 Section 5. Section 69.103, Florida Statutes, is created to
148 read:
149 69.103 Litigation financing agreement; representation of
150 client interests; potential conflicts of interest.—A court may
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
151 take the existence of a litigation financing agreement into
152 account:
153 (1) In a class action lawsuit brought in the courts of
154 this state when determining whether a class representative or
155 class counsel would adequately and fairly represent the
156 interests of the class.
157 (2) In actions involving a common question of law or fact
158 pending before the court which may be or has been consolidated
159 when determining whether the lead counsel or any co-lead counsel
160 would adequately and fairly represent the interests of the
161 parties to such actions.
162 Section 6. Section 69.105, Florida Statutes, is created to
163 read:
164 69.105 Prohibited conduct.—A litigation financier may not:
165 (1) Direct, or make any decisions with respect to, the
166 course of any civil action, administrative proceeding, claim, or
167 other legal proceeding for which the litigation financier has
168 provided financing, or any settlement or other disposition
169 thereof. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to,
170 decisions in appointing or changing counsel, choice or use of
171 expert witnesses, and litigation strategy. All rights to make
172 decisions with respect to the course and settlement or other
173 disposition of the subject civil action, administrative
174 proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding remain solely with
175 the parties to such action, claim, or proceeding and their
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
176 counsel of record.
177 (2) Contract for or receive, whether directly or
178 indirectly, a larger share of the proceeds of a civil action, an
179 administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding
180 financed by a litigation financing agreement than the share of
181 the proceeds collectively recovered by the plaintiffs to any
182 such action, claim, or proceeding after the payment of any
183 attorney fees and costs owed in connection to such action,
184 claim, or proceeding.
185 (3) Pay or offer to pay a commission, referral fee, or
186 other consideration to any person, including an attorney, a law
187 firm, or a health care practitioner, for referring a person to
188 the litigation financier.
189 (4) Assign or securitize a litigation financing agreement,
190 in whole or in part.
191 (5) Be assigned rights to or in a civil action, an
192 administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding
193 for which the litigation financier provided financing, other
194 than the right to receive a share of the proceeds of such
195 action, claim, or proceeding pursuant to the litigation
196 financing agreement.
197 Section 7. Section 69.107, Florida Statutes, is created to
198 read:
199 69.107 Transparency for foreign litigation funders.—
200 (1) If a party to a civil action, administrative
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
201 proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding, or that party's
202 counsel of record, has entered into a litigation financing
203 agreement with a foreign person, foreign principal, or sovereign
204 wealth fund, the party shall, within 14 days after execution of
205 the agreement or within 7 days after filing such action,
206 whichever occurs first, file and serve a notice that:
207 (a) Identifies the existence of the funding relationship.
208 (b) Identifies the foreign person, foreign principal, or
209 sovereign wealth fund by legal name and the jurisdiction under
210 the law of which the litigation financing agreement is
211 organized.
212 (c) Identifies each foreign person, foreign principal, or
213 sovereign wealth fund that, directly or indirectly, owns or
214 controls 3 percent or more of the capital, equity, or other
215 beneficial ownership interests in the litigation financier,
216 including the legal name, address, and citizenship or country of
217 incorporation or registration of each such person or entity.
218 (2) The notice required in subsection (1) must be filed
219 with the court, administrative agency, or tribunal in which the
220 action is pending, served on all parties, and provided to the
221 Department of Financial Services and the Office of the Attorney
222 General.
223 (3) The dollar amounts, financing terms, and other
224 proprietary or trade-secret information contained in or related
225 to the litigation financing agreement are not required to be
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
226 disclosed in the notice. The court may permit the notice or
227 supporting documentation to be filed under seal and may issue
228 protective orders as necessary to safeguard proprietary or
229 confidential information.
230 (4) A foreign funder or any person acting on behalf of the
231 foreign funder may not:
232 (a) Use a domestic entity or affiliate to conceal or evade
233 the disclosure requirements of this section; or
234 (b) Receive, transmit, or share proprietary, privileged,
235 or national security-related information obtained through
236 litigation financing with any foreign person, foreign principal,
237 or sovereign wealth fund that is not a party or an attorney to
238 the action.
239 (5) The requirements of this section apply to a litigation
240 financing agreement entered into with a litigation financier if
241 a foreign person, foreign principal, or sovereign wealth fund
242 has provided or will provide funds, whether directly or
243 indirectly, to the litigation financier that amount to 5 percent
244 or more of the funds the financier has provided or is committed
245 to provide under the litigation funding agreement.
246 (6) Failure to comply with this section may subject the
247 noncomplying party to appropriate sanctions under s. 69.111 or
248 the applicable rules of civil procedure. This section does not
249 create a private cause of action.
250 Section 8. Section 69.111, Florida Statutes, is created to
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
251 read:
252 69.111 Penalties; enforcement.—
253 (1) A litigation financing agreement executed in violation
254 of this part is void and unenforceable.
255 (2) A violation of s. 69.105 is a deceptive and unfair
256 trade practice actionable under part II of chapter 501.
257 (3) A court, an agency, or a tribunal of competent
258 jurisdiction may impose fines or any other sanction it deems
259 appropriate upon any person who violates s. 69.107.
260 Section 9. If any provision of this act or its application
261 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
262 does not affect other provisions or applications of the act
263 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
264 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
265 severable.
266 Section 10. The disclosure requirements in s. 69.107,
267 Florida Statutes, as created by this act, apply to any civil
268 action, administrative proceeding, claim, or other legal
269 proceeding pending or commenced on or after July 1, 2026. Any
270 party to or counsel of record for a civil action, an
271 administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding
272 pending on July 1, 2026, who would have been required to make a
273 disclosure under s. 69.107, Florida Statutes, had it been in
274 effect at the time the relevant action occurred, must make such
275 disclosure within 30 days after July 1, 2026. Failure to do so
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1157 2026
276 is sanctionable as provided in s. 69.111, Florida Statutes.
277 Section 11. Except as otherwise provided herein, this act
278 applies to a litigation financing agreement entered into on or
279 after July 1, 2026.
280 Section 12. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1157-00